California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
A board of supervisors may, acting separately or in conjunction with State or Federal agencies, or with another county, burn or remove debris, rubbish, brush, and grass from the county highways. When acting in conjunction with other agencies or counties, a board may so act outside its county.

The expense incurred by a county, acting pursuant to this section, shall be paid out of any road fund of the county. When a county is acting in conjunction with another agency or county the share of the expense to be borne by each shall be arrived at by agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

954.

All county highways which for a period of five consecutive years are impassable for vehicular travel, and on which during such period of time no public money is expended for maintenance, are unnecessary highways. The board of supervisors of any county on its own motion, or on the petition of any interested taxpayer of the county, may designate such county highway a stock trail. The board of supervisors shall cause notices to be posted upon such stock trails, and also at the entrance of such stock trails, directing all persons to drive all untethered stock thereon.

After a stock trail has been established or designated as provided in this chapter, the county is not liable for death or injury to a vehicle owner or operator or passenger, or for damage to a vehicle or its contents, resulting from a dangerous condition of the stock trail.

Such stock trails shall not be included in the term “maintained mileage of county roads” as that term is used in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

954.5.

(a) The board of supervisors may, by resolution, terminate the maintenance of any county highway if it finds that the highway is unnecessary for the public convenience.

(b) Evidence that a county highway is unnecessary for the public convenience shall be taken at a public hearing set in accordance with the procedures for vacation of a public street, highway, or service easement in Sections 8323 and 8324. Notice of the hearing shall be mailed to the owner of any property served by that portion of a county highway subject to the termination of maintenance. A county highway may be deemed unnecessary for the public convenience on the basis of any of the following:

(1) The county highway does not provide the primary access to occupied properties.

(2) Traffic on the county highway is intermittent and of low volume.

(3) The county highway is impassable for more than six months and there is no demand that it be reopened.

(c) A certified copy of the resolution terminating maintenance shall be recorded as provided in Section 8325.

(d) If the board of supervisors resumes maintenance of a county highway on which maintenance was terminated under this section, a notice of maintenance shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder.

(e) If a determination is made that maintenance is no longer necessary, the county shall post signs clearly visible from the traveled highway at each intersection of the highway for which maintenance is being terminated with a maintained highway indicating that the county no longer maintains the highway. The sign shall read as follows: “This road is not maintained. ____ County is not responsible for any loss or injury suffered by reason of its use.” The county shall provide adequate maintenance to ensure that the signs remain posted in the appropriate places and the message is legible for a period of one year. Once such action is taken and duly recorded and the required signs are posted, the county shall not be held liable for the death of or injury to a vehicle owner, operator, or passenger, or for damage to a vehicle or its contents, resulting from a dangerous condition on such highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

954.6.

(a) A board of supervisors, by resolution, may terminate the maintenance of all or a portion of a county highway if it finds that another public agency will maintain the highway or that portion of it pursuant to an agreement meeting the requirements of Section 941.6. The resolution terminating maintenance shall identify the county highway, or portion of it, for which maintenance will be terminated and also the agency that will perform the maintenance. A certified copy of the resolution shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder.

(b) As to each county highway, or portion of a county highway, for which the board terminates maintenance pursuant to subdivision (a), the county shall post signs at each intersection of that highway with a maintained highway, if any, indicating that the county no longer maintains the highway. The signs shall be clearly visible from the traveled highway and shall read: “This road not maintained by ____ County. ____ County is not responsible for any loss or injury resulting from use of this road.” The county shall provide adequate maintenance for the signs to ensure that for a period of one year each sign remains posted in the appropriate place and the message is legible.

(c) After a resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) is duly recorded in the office of the county recorder and the signs required by subdivision (b) are posted, while the agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) is in effect, the county shall not be liable for the death of, or injury to, any person or for damage to any real or personal property resulting from a dangerous condition of the highway or portion of the highway, as described in the resolution, caused by inadequate maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 766, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

960.

Whenever the board of supervisors determines that any real property, or interest therein, acquired by the county for highway purposes is no longer necessary for those purposes, the county may sell or exchange the real property, or interest therein, in the manner and upon the terms and conditions approved by the board of supervisors. Any conveyance under this section shall be executed on behalf of the county by the chairman of the board of supervisors, and the money received for the real property shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of any fund available for highway purposes, which the board of supervisors designates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 177, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

960.5.

The term “county highway” as used in Sections 954 and 954.5 shall be deemed to include, but not be limited to, any public highway, road, street, avenue, alley, lane, drive, way, place, court, or trail, or any purported county highway, public highway, road, street, avenue, alley, lane, drive, way, place, court, or trail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

960.6.

The board of supervisors may, by ordinance or resolution, delegate to a county official, subject to rules or regulations as the board may impose, the authority to lease any real property acquired by the county for highway purposes for a renewable term not exceeding three years. Proceeds from the lease of the property shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of any fund designated by the board of supervisors which is available for highway purposes.

At least five working days prior to entering into a lease under this section, a notice of intention to enter into a lease shall be posted in a public place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 360, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

964.

Whenever the board finds that any county highway has been damaged or is in danger of being damaged by storm waters or floods, the board shall adopt all measures necessary to repair or prevent such damage. The board may condemn the right of way for, and may construct, flumes, ditches or canals for the purpose of carrying off such storm waters or floods.

The board may cause any expense incurred under this section to be paid out of the county general fund, or out of the funds of any road districts in which the highways are protected from damage or repaired by the work done.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

965.

The board of supervisors shall, by order, direct the district attorney of the county to institute eminent domain proceedings, in the name of the county, whenever it is necessary to acquire real property or any interest therein to do any of the following things for the protection of a county highway:

(a) Raise the banks along any stream.

(b) Remove obstructions from any stream.

(c) Widen, change, deepen or straighten the channel of any stream.

(d) Construct flumes, ditches or canals, or make any improvements for the purpose of carrying off storm waters or floods.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

966.

(a) The board of supervisors may provide for the erection and maintenance of gates on the county highways to avoid the necessity of building highway fences. The board may prescribe rules and regulations for closing such gates, and penalties for violating such rules and regulations.

(b) The person, for whose immediate benefit the gates are erected or maintained, shall in all cases bear the expense of such erection and maintenance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

967.

Whenever a right of way for a highway is conveyed to a county and the sole consideration for the conveyance is an agreement by the county to construct and maintain a highway on the right of way and to construct highway fences on the right of way boundaries, and thereafter such right of way becomes a county highway, the board of supervisors may, within five years from the date of such conveyance, construct highway fences along the boundaries of such right of way.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

968.

The board may cause the expense of constructing such fences to be charged to and paid from the county general fund, the road fund of the county or the district fund of each district benefited, but not more than one-half of the expense may be paid from the county general fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------

969.

Whenever a road is of general utility and of public convenience and constitutes the only or principal means of communication between one town or village and another town or village in the same county, the board of supervisors may determine, by a two-thirds vote of its membership, that the public convenience and necessity demand the acquisition and reconstruction of such road. Thereafter, by a resolution passed by a two-thirds vote of its membership, the board may determine to, and after such determination may proceed to, acquire and reconstruct such road although it is not of the width required by Section 906. The board shall charge the expense of such acquisition and reconstruction to the county general fund, the road fund of the county, or the district fund of each district benefited, or to any two or more of such funds in such proportions as the board considers just and equitable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------

969.5.

Such boards may, after they have determined by a resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote of their membership that general county interest demands the improvement or repair of a privately owned road, improve or repair such road in consideration of the grant or lease of a right of way to the county for its own use or the use of the State, any political subdivision or other appropriate public agency for the public purposes specified in the resolution.

Such improvements or repairs shall be made and paid for in like manner as improvements or repairs of county highways.

By the same authorization the board may rent to the owner of land over which such a road has been open to the public for more than five years the machinery and equipment necessary to repair such road and the approaches thereto and any protecting embankments there may be, charging therefor by way of rental the cost of labor and other necessary expenses in addition to a reasonable allowance for depreciation of machinery.

Proceedings under this section shall not cause the road to become a county highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

969.6.

Notwithstanding Section 969.5 or any other provision of this code, if a state of local emergency is declared by the board of supervisors as a result of locally heavy rainfall or flood, the board may authorize the expenditure of road funds for the purpose of emergency repairs to public roads which are not county highways and not in the county maintained system, without obtaining a grant or lease of right-of-way, if the repairs are necessary to provide minimum public access necessary for the protection or preservation of health or safety of residents. The county shall not be responsible for the maintenance of any road so repaired, and it shall not be liable for the condition of the road after the emergency repairs are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

970.5.

Whenever the board of supervisors or a county officer designated by the board to be in charge of naming county highways finds that a name should be adopted and applied to any county highway, or that the existing name of any county highway should be changed, the board or the designated county officer shall hold a public hearing on the proposed name for, or the change of name of, such highway. Notice of such hearing shall be given by posting notice in at least three public places along the street or streets proposed to be affected, such posting to be complete at least 10 days before the day set for the hearing. At the time set for the hearing or at any time to which the hearing may be continued the board or the designated county officer shall hear and consider proposals to adopt a name for, or change the name of, the highway mentioned in the notice and objections to such proposals. At or after the conclusion of the hearing the board or the designated county officer may adopt a name for, or change the name of, such highway, and upon the adoption or change thereof shall make an order and file said order with the board of supervisors officially designating the name for such highway. Thereafter such highway shall be known by the name so designated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 307.)
-------------------------------------------

971.

Any county highway which has not been officially named may be officially named by the board of supervisors or a county officer designated by the board without any hearing, or notice. Such naming shall be by an order duly made and filed with the board of supervisors. Thereafter the highway shall be known by the name thus designated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 307.)
-------------------------------------------

972.

A board of supervisors may, by ordinance, permit the use of any county highway which connects with a main county highway of an adjoining county, by the board of supervisors of such adjoining county for the purpose of constructing and maintaining thereon a highway serving the needs of residents of both counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 413.)
-------------------------------------------

973.

The board of the county seeking the use, if it accepts the provisions of the ordinance adopted by the board of the county granting the use, may:

(a) Construct and maintain any such highway.

(b) Construct and maintain on such highway such bridges as it deems necessary. 

(c) Improve such highway in such manner as it determines.

(d) Acquire real property or interests therein adjacent to such highway in an adjoining county for county purposes, and expend thereon such amounts as the board deems necessary for county purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

974.

The expense of any work done or acquisition made pursuant to section 973 shall be paid by the county to which the use is granted out of the county general fund, or such other fund of the county as the board designates or makes available.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

975.

The board of any county to which the use is granted, pursuant to the provisions of section 972, may, by mutual consent expressed through ordinances of the respective boards, retransfer the use, control, and maintenance of any highway, constructed under the provisions of sections 972 and 973, to the county originally granting the use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

976.

The board of supervisors of any county may purchase or lease with the consent of the owner, or may obtain by gift, and may hold, improve or maintain any real property or interest therein for the uses and purposes of county highways. Such real property or interest need not be within the boundaries of the county acquiring it, if it is convenient thereto in an adjoining county. In all such cases such property or interest is subject to the control of the county acquiring it and to the ordinances, rules, and regulations of such county.

Nothing in this section shall affect the power of any county to acquire property within its boundaries by proceedings in eminent domain in the manner prescribed by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

977.

The board of supervisors of any county desiring to act under section 976 may, by unanimous vote of its membership, determine what real property is necessary and proper for the uses and purposes of county highways. Any county thus desiring to purchase or lease with the consent of the owner, or to obtain, hold, improve or maintain, real property or an interest therein situated within an adjoining county shall first obtain the consent by resolution of the board of supervisors of the adjoining county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

978.

Whenever the United States government grants real property to a county for highway uses and purposes, the county may take and dispose of such real property and the board of supervisors shall have, with regard to such real property, the powers of management, control and disposition provided by law for other county property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

979.

The board of supervisors shall keep in repair all objects or markers adjacent to a county highway which have been erected to mark registered historical places and shall keep such markers free from all vegetation which may obscure them from view.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

982.

Except as provided in this section, the board of supervisors shall have power to temporarily close all or any part of any public highway, road, street, avenue, alley, lane or place and grant the possession and use thereof, together with the management and control thereof, to any person, firm or corporation operating, managing and controlling any exposition or fair in aid of which the granting of public moneys or other things of value has been authorized by the Constitution or laws of this State upon such terms and conditions, and for such periods of time, as the board of supervisors may determine, such possession, use, management and control to terminate not later than one year after the closing of such exposition or fair. As to State highways, the exercise of any power granted hereby shall be subject to the approval of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 656.)
-------------------------------------------

985.

The board of supervisors may construct, install and maintain cattle guards on or adjacent to the county highways. The cost of constructing, installing, and maintaining such cattle guards may be paid from the general county fund.

The board of supervisors may, under such restrictions, plans and specifications as it may deem proper, permit any property owner to construct, install or maintain at his own expense, cattle guards on or adjacent to any county highway. The construction and maintenance of such cattle guards shall be under the direction and supervision of the board of supervisors, and they may require such bond as they deem proper as a condition of the granting of permission to erect such cattle guard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

989.

(a) (1) Upon the incorporation of a city or upon the annexation of territory to a city, all right, title, and interest of the county, including the underlying fee where owned by the county, in and to any county highway within the territory involved, which had been accepted into the county road system pursuant to Section 941 shall vest in the city and shall thereupon constitute a city street. 

(2) All right, title, and interest of a county in and to any county highway included within territory heretofore incorporated as a city or annexed to a city is hereby determined to have vested in the city as a city street. 

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a road or highway which had been accepted into the county road system pursuant to Section 941 after the date of the first signature on a petition for annexation or incorporation, the adoption of a resolution of application by an affected local agency, or a date mutually agreed upon by the city and county. 

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) requires a city to improve the affected road or highway to city standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 531, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

990.

Where practical or desirable, the board of supervisors shall, along any highway under its jurisdiction, possession, or control, replace trees that have been destroyed or removed because of projects undertaken to widen the highway.

Money received by county from the Highway Users Tax Fund available for the widening of highways is also available for the planting of trees pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

991.

Before any bridge on a county highway is constructed over any navigable river, the board of supervisors, after a study and public hearing on the question, shall determine and shall prepare a report on the feasibility of providing public access to the river for recreational purposes and a determination as to whether such public access shall be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 972.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Road Districts [1020. - 1029.]

1020.

The boards of supervisors may divide their respective counties into suitable road districts, may change the boundaries thereof, and may create new districts. The board shall not include in such road district any city wherein street work and improvements are done by virtue of any law relating to street work and improvements within such city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 414.)
-------------------------------------------

1026.

Whenever the board of supervisors finds that any road district in such county is or will be unreasonably burdened by the expense of constructing or maintaining any county highway, or any bridge or tunnel connecting or forming a part of such highway, or by the expense of the purchase of any toll roads the board may:

(a) Order the whole or any portion of the aggregate expense to be paid out of the road fund of the county.

(b) By a majority vote of the board’s membership, order the whole or any portion of the expense of construction or repair of such bridges or tunnels, or a portion of the expense of the purchase of such toll roads, to be paid out of the county general fund.

(c) By unanimous vote of the board’s membership, order the whole or any portion of the expense of material for highway construction to be paid out of the county general fund.

(d) By a four-fifths vote of the board’s membership, order to be paid out of the county general fund or the road fund, or both, the whole or any portion of the expense of constructing, reconstructing or repairing any bridges or highways destroyed or damaged by storms, floods or calamities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------

1027.

When the alteration of an old or the opening of a new county highway necessitates the removal of fences on real property acquired for highway purposes, the road commissioner shall serve upon the owner, his occupant or his agent, a notice to remove the fences, or in lieu of such service may post such notice on the fences which are to be removed.

If, within ten days after such service or posting, the removal is not completed, or is not commenced and then being prosecuted with due diligence, the road commissioner may cause the fence to be carefully removed at the expense of the owner, and may recover judgment of him for the cost of such removal. The road commissioner may sell the fence material and apply the proceeds toward the satisfaction of the judgment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1028.

The board of supervisors may call, at such times as in the judgment of the board may be required, a special meeting of the board for hearing highway and road matters. At such special meetings the board shall hear highway and bridge reports and complaints from officers and citizens, and shall take such action regarding the reports and complaints as the public welfare demands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

1029.

The consolidation of road districts as provided in Section 2006 shall be without prejudice to the legal requirement that all road district taxes collected in any one such district shall be expended in that district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Private Byroads [1050. - 1054.]

1050.

For the purposes of this chapter, “private byroads” are roads opened, laid out, or altered for the purpose of providing access to parcels of contiguous private land of more than 100 acres which have been cut off by a change in the course of a navigable stream. Except as provided in this chapter, private byroads may be opened, laid out, or altered for the necessity of one or more residents or landowners of any road district in the same manner, and using the same procedure, as specified for the opening, laying out, or altering of public roads as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1160) of Chapter 4; provided, however, that only one petitioner is necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------

1051.

The petitioner shall be a landowner in the road district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------

1052.

The petitioner shall accompany the petition with a bond, approved by the board of supervisors, in double the amount of the probable cost of the proceedings, including the market value for land taken and any severance damage resulting from the taking, and shall be conditioned that the petitioner will pay all costs of the proceedings, including any compensation which may be awarded to any landowner. The bond shall be further conditioned that the petitioner will pay to the person over whose land the private byroad is sought to be opened or altered, the necessary costs and disbursements in contesting the opening or alteration of the private byroad, in case the petition is not granted or the private byroad is finally not opened or altered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 374.)
-------------------------------------------

1053.

The board of supervisors may, by resolution, order the private byroad to be opened, laid out, or altered. The clerk shall cause such order to be recorded in the office of the county recorder within five days, naming the owner of the dominant tenement as “grantee” and the owner of the servient tenement as “grantor.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.

The person for whose benefit the private byroad is required shall pay the landowner the market value for land taken and any severance damage resulting from such taking and shall build and maintain the private byroad.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Methods of Performing Highway Work [1070. - 1197.]



  ARTICLE 1. By Boards of Supervisors [1070. - 1070.]

1070.

Whenever a board of supervisors, by a four-fifths vote of its membership, determines that the public convenience and necessity demand the acquisition or construction of a new county highway or the improvement, repair or maintenance of any existing county highway, and that the expense of such new highway or the expense of improving, repairing or maintaining such existing highway is too great to pay out of the road fund of the district, the board may, by a resolution passed by a four-fifths vote of its membership, determine to make such acquisition or do such work, and charge the expense thereof to the county general fund, the road fund of the county or the district fund of any district benefited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. By Permanent Road Divisions [1160. - 1197.]

1160.

As used in this article:

(a) “Division” means permanent road division.

(b) “Last equalized assessment roll” means the last assessment roll made up by the county assessor, including the changes ordered by the board of supervisors sitting as a board of equalization.

(c) “Highway” means any county road or highway or any public roadway right of way or any private easement or roadway not accepted or acceptable into the county highway system but upon which a permanent public easement is offered or any privately owned road which meets the requirements of and in connection with which the necessary findings of Section 969.5 of this code can be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 981.)
-------------------------------------------

1160.5.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Permanent Road Division Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 578, Sec. 4.   Effective August 26, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

1161.

Any portion of a county, not already contained in a division, may be formed into a division under the provisions of this article. When formed, each division shall have the powers enumerated in this article. For the purpose of this article, a city is not a division, but may be included in a division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1162.

A petition for the formation of a division may be presented to the board of supervisors of the county wherein the division is proposed to be formed. The petition shall contain:

(a) The name of the proposed division.

(b) The signatures of at least a majority of the landowners within the proposed division or the signatures of owners of more than 50 percent of the assessed valuation within the division.

(c) The boundaries of the proposed division.

(d) The number of acres therein and the assessed valuation of such acreage according to the last equalized assessment roll of the county.

(e) The value of the improvements on real estate and of the personal property within the proposed division according to the last equalized assessment roll.

(f) The number of inhabitants therein, as nearly as can be ascertained.

(g) A particular description of the location of any highway which it is desired to construct, improve or permanently maintain or maintain for a specified number of years, in the event of which such limited period of maintenance the period thereof shall be shown and a statement showing the necessity for such work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1308.)
-------------------------------------------

1162.5.

(a) In lieu of submission of a petition pursuant to Section 1162, formation of a division may be initiated by a resolution of the board of supervisors. The resolution shall meet all the requirements of Section 1162 except those relating to signatures of landowners. In addition, the resolution shall fix a time and place for a public hearing on the establishment of the proposed division which shall not be less than 30 nor more than 60 days after the adoption of the resolution.

(b) The clerk of the board of supervisors shall publish a notice of the hearing pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county, or, if there is no newspaper published in the county, in a newspaper of general circulation which is circulated in the territory proposed to be included within the division. Publication shall be complete at least seven days prior to the date of the hearing. The notice shall contain the text of the resolution, the time and place for the hearing, and a statement that at the hearing the testimony of all interested persons for or against the establishment of the division will be heard.

At least 20 days before the date set for the hearing, the clerk of the board of supervisors shall mail copies of the notice to all affected landowners whose names appear on the last equalized assessment roll.

(c) At the hearing, protests against the establishment of the division may be made orally or in writing by any interested person. Any protests pertaining to the regularity or sufficiency of the proceedings shall be in writing and clearly set forth the irregularities and defects to which objection is made. All written protests shall be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors on or before the time fixed for the hearing and may be withdrawn in writing at any time before the conclusion of the hearing. The board may waive any irregularities in the form or content of any written protest and at the hearing may correct minor defects in the proceedings.

(d) If written protests are received from at least 25 percent but not more than 50 percent of the affected landowners, or landowners who would be required to pay any proposed special tax or parcel charge which represents more than 25 percent of the total amount of the expected revenue necessary to finance the division, and those protests are not withdrawn by the end of the hearing, the proposed division shall be submitted to the landowners for majority voter approval.

If written protests are received from 50 percent or more of the affected landowners, or landowners who would be required to pay any proposed special tax or parcel charge which represents more than 50 percent of the total amount of the expected revenue necessary to finance the division and those protests are not withdrawn by the end of the hearing, the proposed division shall be abandonded for at least one year.

(e) The board of supervisors may conduct, by mail, any election held to approve or disapprove a proposed division.

(f) If no election is required pursuant to subdivision (d), the division may be formed pursuant to Section 1166.

(g) If an election is required pursuant to subdivision (d), the board of supervisors may include on the same ballot the question of whether a special tax shall be levied within the division. The board of supervisors may submit the question of levy of a special tax to the voters separately from the question of formation of the division, or may consolidate both questions into a single measure. Sections 1173 to 1178, inclusive, are applicable to an election held pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 70, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1162.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board of supervisors may form a permanent road division without reference to a specific permanent road project. The division may include the entire unincorporated area of the county. The board may create zones within the division for specific permanent road projects, with differing special taxes or parcel charges. Parcel charges shall be deemed to be assessments within the meaning of Article XIIID of the California Constitution.

(b) Formation of the division shall be initiated by resolution of the board of supervisors that sets a time and date for a hearing on the matter. Notice of the hearing shall be given pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county, or, if there is no newspaper of general circulation published in the county, in a newspaper of general circulation that is circulated within the territory proposed to be included within the division. Publication shall be complete at least seven days prior to the hearing.

(c) At the hearing, the board of supervisors shall hear all objections to the establishment of the division and shall determine whether to form the division.

(d) Proceedings to form a division or zones may be consolidated with an assessment ballot proceeding pursuant to Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 269, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1163.

Such petition shall be accompanied by an affidavit stating that affiant has compared the valuations given in the petition with those on the last equalized assessment roll and that such valuations are complete and correct. The affiant shall be a person over the age of eighteen who is not a signatory to the petition and who owns no taxable property in the division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1164.

Such petition shall be published in the manner authorized by Section 1196, together with a notice stating the time of the meeting at which the board will consider the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1165.

Such petition shall be presented either at a regular meeting of the board or at a special meeting called to receive and consider it. On the day stated in the notice the board shall hear the petition and may adjourn such hearing from time to time, but not longer than one month in all.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1166.

Following the hearing or election, as the case may be, the board shall decide if the proposed division is to be formed. If the board decides to form the division, it may make changes in the boundaries as it finds proper and shall define and establish the boundaries. The changes shall not include any territory outside of the boundaries described in the petition or resolution unless the board has given at least 15 days’ notice of its intention to include that territory in the division. The notice shall be given by publication, in the the manner authorized by Section 1196, and by leaving a copy of the notice at each place of abode in the outside territory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 70, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1167.
